Washington statutes.
RCW 13.22.040

Reporting requirements for the department.

(1) The department must compile, on a monthly basis until November 1, 2022, the following information with respect to juveniles confined in all state institutions and facilities used for juvenile rehabilitation for whom isolation or room confinement was used in excess of one hour:

(a) The number of times isolation and room confinement were used;

(b) The circumstances leading to the use of isolation and room confinement;

(c) The duration of each use of isolation and whether, for each instance of isolation, the use of isolation lasted more than four hours within a twenty-four hour period;

(d) Whether or not supervisory review occurred and was documented for each instance of isolation and room confinement;

(e) The race and age of the juvenile for each instance of isolation and room confinement;

(f) Whether or not a medical assessment or review and a mental health assessment or review were conducted and documented for each instance of isolation; and

(g) If the affected juvenile was not afforded access to medication, meals, and reading material during the term of confinement for each instance of isolation and room confinement.

(2) Until November 1, 2022, information collected under subsection (1) of this section must be compiled into a report and submitted in compliance with RCW 13.22.060(1).

(3) After November 1, 2022, the department must annually compile the information collected under subsection (1) of this section. The information collected must be posted on the department's website.

[ 2020 c 333 s 5.]